aspell/se_affix.dat
SFX R   0               mussanan                [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussanat                [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaneame              [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaneamet             [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaneaset             [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaneaskka            [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaneatte             [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaneattet            [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussanis                [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussas                  [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussasan                [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussasat                [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaseame              [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaseamet             [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaseaset             [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaseaskka            [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaseatte             [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaseattet            [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaset                [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussasis                [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussaska                [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussat                  [aeiouá]
SFX R   0               mussii                  [aeiouá]

#DIMINC
#SFX L Y

REP 
REP a á
REP á a
